dictionaries/cs/index.dic
bezvětrný/YKRO
blátivý/YKRON
bouřlivý/YKRON
chce/BN
chmurný/YKRON
chodě/XN
chtě/XN
chtěje/XN
chvěl/ON
cítě/XN
dbaje/XN
dbán/ON
dobit/ON
dobrat/ATXN
dobudu/BN
dochrchlat/JTXN
dochvěl/ON
dodlabat/AJTXN
dodupu/BN
dohudl/ON
dohuhlat/JTXN
dohřát/BON
dojel/ON
dokapu/BN
dokontrolovat/ATXN
dokovu/BN
dolit/ON
doliv/XN
dolíbat/JTXN
domnívaje/XN
domuchlat/JTXN
domýt/BTN
doodepsal/ON
dooději/BN
doohřát/BON
doplet/ON
doplout/BN
doptat/JTXN
dopěji/BN
dopěl/ON
dorazit/ACXN
doseji/BN
dosel/ON
dospěji/BN
dospěl/ON
dostoupit/ATXN
dostál/ON
dostůňu/BN
dotrpět/BTN
dotrpěv/XN
doudím/BN
doufaje/XN
doučil/ON
dovlekl/ON
dovlát/BN
dovléknuv/XN
dovybrat/ATXN
doznat/JTXN
dozrát/BN
dořeknut/ON
dořeknuv/XN
došel/ON
dožat/ON
doženu/BN
dra/XN
drže/XN
dusný/YKRON
dávaje/XN
dím/BN
dívaje/XN
děl/ON
hladov/O
hledaje/XN
hledě/XN
hnán/ON
hrd/O
hudu/BN
ignoruje/XN
jat/ON
jda/XN
jist/ON
jmu/BN
jsa/XN
kleče/XN
klubu/BN
kluzký/YKRON
krátký/YKRON
kráčeje/XN
krýt/BTN
kývaje/XN
lapaje/XN
lačný/YKRON
ležatý/YKRON
leže/XN
lha/XN
libý/YKRON
ložen/ON
lít/BN
maje/XN
maličký/YKO
milerád/O
mlet/ON
mluvě/XN
modrý/YKRON
moha/XN
mra/XN
mrzut/ON
mumlaje/XN
mysle/XN
mysleje/XN
mátl/ON
mávaje/XN
mýt/BTN
mělký/YKRON
měnit/ATXN
nabrat/ATXN
nabyl/ON
nachrchlat/JXN
nachýlit/ATXN
nadejdu/BN
nadepsal/ON
nadjedu/BN
nadjet/ION
naději/BN
nahlédnout/ATXN
nahřát/BON
najdu/BN
najet/ION
nalezen/ON
naliv/XN
nalít/BN
namlel/ON
napaden/ON
napjat/ON
napleji/BN
napomožen/ON
napsán/ON
napíši/BN
narazit/ACXN
narážeje/XN
naseji/BN
naset/ON
naslouchaje/XN
nastav/XN
nastelu/BN
nastudit/ACXN
nastál/ON
natrpět/BTN
natřásl/ON
navléknuv/XN
navrhnut/ON
nazout/BTN
nařeknut/ON
naříkaje/XN
našít/BTN
nažal/ON
nesa/XN
nudný/YKRO
nějaký/YRO
obehrát/BTN
obelhal/ON
obestelu/BN
obestlal/ON
obestoupit/ATXN
objat/ON
objímaje/XN
obkoušu/BN
oblažen/O
obléknuv/XN
obměnit/ATXN
obout/BTN
obrat/ATXNH
obrostl/ON
obstoupit/ATXN
obvit/ON
obvít/BN
octnul/ON
odbít/BN
odchrchlat/JTXN
odchýlit/ATXN
oddychuje/XN
odehnán/ON
odejedu/BN
odemlel/ON
odepsal/ON
odepíši/BN
odestojím/BN
odečtl/ON
odjedu/BN
odkázán/ON
odliv/HXN
odlít/BN
odpovězen/ON
odrazit/ACXN
odstojím/BN
odstál/ON
odtrpěv/XN
odtát/BTN
odveden/ON
odvlát/BN
odvolávaje/XN
odčtl/ON
oděju/BN
odňat/ON
odříznutý/YKRNO
ohlížeje/XN
ohřát/BON
okoušu/BN
omlet/ON
omýt/BTN
opsal/ON
optat/JTXN
orazit/ACXN
oseji/BN
osel/ONPIV
otřesen/ON
ovát/BON
ovít/BN
očekávaje/XN
oženu/BN
pamětliv/O
pilný/YKRON
plakaje/XN
platný/YKRON
plný/YKRON
plout/BN
pobudu/BN
pobyl/ON
pocestuji/BN
podebrat/ATXN
podejdu/BN
podemlel/ON
podepíši/BN
podestlal/ON
podjedu/BN
podjel/ON
podoben/ON
podrazit/ACXN
podrýt/BTN
podvedl/ON
podvléknuv/XN
poději/BN
podťal/ON
pohotov/ON
pohrát/BTN
pokapu/BN
pokojen/ON
pokornět/AJTXN
pokračuje/XN
pokvetu/BN
polknout/ATXN
polomrtev/O
pomaten/ON
pomatu/BN
pomuchlat/JTXN
pomátl/ON
pomýlit/ATXN
ponesu/BN
poodjel/ON
pookřát/BN
popadaje/XN
popohnal/ON
popojdu/BN
poporostl/ON
popoženu/BN
popásl/ON
popíšu/BN
porazit/ACXN
poseji/BN
poset/ON
postelu/BN
postihnut/ON
poteče/BN
potrpěv/XN
potřesen/ON
pousmát/BN
poučil/ON
používaje/XN
povanu/BN
povinován/ON
povyrazit/ACXN
povyrostu/BN
povědom/ON
pozbyt/ON
poznat/JTXN
počítaje/XN
poštěstil/ON
pošít/BTN
pravě/XN
probit/ON
problít/BN
prochrchlat/JTXN
produpu/BN
proděravěn/ON
prohlédnout/ATXN
prohuhlat/JTXN
prohřát/BON
projdu/BN
prokleji/BN
proklel/ON
prokovit/ATXN
prokrýt/BTN
prolíbat/JTXN
pronajat/ON
propasu/BN
propíši/BN
propůjčil/ON
proseji/BN
prospěji/BN
prostoupit/ATXN
prostál/ON
protrpět/BTN
provedu/BN
provlékl/ON
provléknuv/XN
prošít/BTN
proťal/ON
píši/BN
pěl/ON
přebrat/ATXN
přechýlit/ATXN
předehrát/BTN
předemelu/BN
předemlel/ON
předeženu/BN
předjel/ON
předstoupit/ATXN
předvedu/BN
předvybrat/ATXN
přehluboký/YRO
přehuhlat/JTXN
přejdu/BN
překout/BTN
přelhal/ON
přeliv/HXN
přelít/BN
přeměnit/ATXN
přepit/ON
přepošlu/BN
přerazit/ACXN
přerostu/BN
přesečen/ON
přespat/BTN
přetnu/BN
přetrpěv/XN
přetřásl/ON
převezmu/BN
převzat/ON
přeřeknu/BN
přeřeknuv/XN
přeširoký/YRO
přibudu/BN
přihřát/BON
přijal/ON
přikovu/BN
přiliv/XN
přioblékl/ON
přioději/BN
připomínaje/XN
připsán/ON
připíši/BN
přislíbit/ATXN
přispat/BN
přisát/BON
přiveden/ON
přivléknuv/XN
přizabít/BN
přiříznutý/YKRNO
přišed/XN
přát/BTN
půjčil/ON
rozchrchlat/JTXN
rozdupu/BN
rozebrat/ATXN
rozejdu/BN
rozemlel/ON
rozeseji/BN
rozestlal/ON
rozestoupit/ATXN
rozetnu/BN
rozeženu/BN
rozhlédnout/ATXN
rozhlížeje/XN
rozklovu/BN
rozkrýt/BTN
rozměnit/ATXN
rozpit/ON
rozptýlit/ATXN
rozrostu/BN
rozsil/ON
rozstoupit/ATXN
rozstůňu/BN
rozvedu/BN
rozvát/BON
rozškubu/BN
rozžehnout/ATXN
rád/O
sbít/BN
sebrat/ATXN
seji/BN
sekl/ON
sepíši/BN
sesekl/ON
sestoupit/ATXN
setnu/BN
seříznutý/YKRNO
sešít/BTN
sežehnout/ATXN
sjedu/BN
skrývaje/XN
slabý/YKRO
sliv/XN
slout/BN
slíbit/ATXN
smutný/YRON
směřuje/XN
soptit/ATXN
soužít/BN
spolknout/ATXN
spolupodepsán/ON
spolupodepíši/BN
spouštěje/XN
spím/BN
stal/ON
stojím/BN
strkaje/XN
střízliv/ON
svedu/BN
svléknuv/XN
syrový/YKRON
sžít/BTN
tajný/YKRON
teka/XN
tvrdě/XN
tát/BTN
těžký/YKRO
třímaje/XN
ubít/BN
uchýlit/ATXN
uhnít/BN
uhněten/ON
ujedu/BN
ukoušu/BN
ukázán/ON
uliv/XN
umelu/BN
upíši/BN
urazit/ACXN
uschl/ON
usmrtit/ACXN
uspěji/BN
ustoupit/ATXN
utnu/BN
utíraje/XN
utřásl/ON
uvidím/BN
uvléknuv/XN
uznat/JTXN
uzounký/YRO
učiniv/XN
uřeknu/BN
uťat/ON
vbít/BN
vdlabat/AJTXN
veplout/BN
vepsán/ON
vevát/BON
vidovat/ATXN
vjel/ON
vkovu/BN
vliv/HXN
volaje/XN
volný/YKRON
vpít/BN
vrazit/ACXN
vstanu/BN
vstoupit/ATXN
vybit/ON
vybít/BN
vychrchlat/JTXN
vydlabat/AJTXN
vyhlídnout/ATXN
vyhnít/BN
vyhuhlat/JTXN
vyjedu/BN
vyjel/ON
vyjímaje/XN
vyklubu/BN
vykrýt/BTN
vyliv/XN
vymlel/ON
vymýt/BTN
vypjat/ON
vypleji/BN
vyptat/JTXN
vypíšu/BN
vypůjčil/ON
vyrýt/BTN
vyslal/ON
vyspat/BTN
vystoupit/ATXN
vystůňu/BN
vysát/BON
vytrpět/BTN
vytrpěv/XN
využívaje/XN
vyvedu/BN
vyznat/JTXN
vyzrát/BN
vyčtl/ON
vyšít/BTN
vyžat/ON
vzdout/BTN
vzpomenuv/XN
vzrostl/ON
vát/BON
všímaje/XN
vženu/BN
zabit/ON
zachvěji/BN
zadlabat/AJTXN
zahlídnout/ATXN
zahrát/BTN
zajat/ON
zajedu/BN
zakovu/BN
zalit/ON
zaliv/XN
zamelu/BN
zanechav/XN
zanedbat/JTXN
zapjat/ON
zapít/BN
zarazit/ACXN
zarostl/ON
zarostu/BN
zaskvěji/BN
zastoupit/ATXN
zatřesen/ON
zatřesu/BN
zavléknuv/XN
zavát/BON
zazebu/BN
zaťal/ON
zblít/BN
zdráv/O
zeptat/JTXN
zhlédnout/ATXN
zjistiv/XN
zkoušu/BN
zliv/XN
zmuchlat/JTXN
zmyšlen/ON
změnit/ATXN
zneuznat/JTXN
zostudit/ACXN
zpokornět/AJTXN
zrubu/BN
zulíbat/JTXN
zval/ON
zíraje/XN
úzký/YKRO
čekaje/XN
čtl/ON
řka/XN
šikmý/YKRON
škubu/BN
žlutý/YKRON
žádaje/XN
